test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_CW_jooweshk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NA - CW - jooweshk :
    
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     jooweshk+NA+Sg: jooweshk
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     jooweshk+NA+Sg+Px1Sg: [njooweshk, njooweshkom]
     jooweshk+NA+Sg+Px2Sg: [gjooweshk, gjooweshkom]
     jooweshk+NA+Sg+PxX: [jooweshk, jooweshkom]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Sg: jooweshkoonh
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Sg: jooweshkoons
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Sg: jooweshkosh
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Sg: jooweshkba
     jooweshk+NA+Voc+Pl: jooweshkdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     jooweshk+NA+Obv: jooweshkon
     jooweshk+NA+Loc: jooweshkong
     jooweshk+NA+Pl: jooweshkog
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Sg+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonh, njooweshkoonyim]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Sg+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoons, njooweshkoonsim]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Sg+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonh, gjooweshkoonyim]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Sg+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoons, gjooweshkoonsim]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Sg+PxX: [jooweshkoonh, jooweshkoonyim]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Sg+PxX: [jooweshkoons, jooweshkoonsim]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 4]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Sg+Px1Sg: [njooweshkosh, njooweshkmish]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Sg+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkosh, gjooweshkmish]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Sg+PxX: [jooweshkosh, jooweshkmish]
    
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 5]
     jooweshk+NA+Sg+Px1Pl: [njooweshknaa, njooweshkminaa]
     jooweshk+NA+Sg+Px21Pl: [gjooweshknaa, gjooweshkminaa]
     jooweshk+NA+Sg+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkwaa, gjooweshkmiwaa]
     jooweshk+NA+Sg+Px4: [jooweshkni, jooweshkmini]
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 6]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Sg+Px1Sg: [njooweshkba, njooweshkmiba]
     jooweshk+NA+Voc+Pl+Px1Sg: [njooweshkdig, njooweshkmidig]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Sg+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkba, gjooweshkmiba]
     jooweshk+NA+Voc+Pl+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkdig, gjooweshkmidig]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Sg+PxX: [jooweshkba, jooweshkmiba]
     jooweshk+NA+Voc+Pl+PxX: [jooweshkdig, jooweshkmidig]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 7]
     jooweshk+NA+Obv+Px1Sg: [njooweshkon, njooweshkman]
     jooweshk+NA+Loc+Px1Sg: [njooweshkong, njooweshkming]
     jooweshk+NA+Pl+Px1Sg: [njooweshkog, njooweshkmag]
     jooweshk+NA+Obv+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkon, gjooweshkman]
     jooweshk+NA+Loc+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkong, gjooweshkming]
     jooweshk+NA+Pl+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkog, gjooweshkmag]
     jooweshk+NA+Obv+Px3Sg: [jooweshkon, jooweshkman]
     jooweshk+NA+Loc+Px3Sg: [jooweshkong, jooweshkming]
     jooweshk+NA+Obv+PxX: [jooweshkon, jooweshkman]
     jooweshk+NA+Loc+PxX: [jooweshkong, jooweshkming]
     jooweshk+NA+Pl+PxX: [jooweshkog, jooweshkmag]
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [2, 4]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Sg: jooweshkoonyish
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Sg: jooweshkoonsish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [2, 6]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Sg: jooweshkoonyba
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: jooweshkoonydig
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Sg: jooweshkoonsba
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: jooweshkoonsdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [2, 7]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Obv: jooweshkoonyin
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Loc: jooweshkoonying
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pl: jooweshkoonyig
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Obv: jooweshkoonsan
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Loc: jooweshkoonsing
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pl: jooweshkoonsag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [4, 6]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Sg: jooweshkshiba
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: jooweshkshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [4, 7]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Obv: jooweshkshan
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Loc: jooweshkshing
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Pl: jooweshkshag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [6, 7]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Obv: jooweshkbaniin
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Loc: jooweshkbaniing
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Pl: jooweshkbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 4]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Sg+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonyish, njooweshkoonymish]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Sg+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonsish, njooweshkoonsmish]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Sg+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonyish, gjooweshkoonymish]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Sg+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonsish, gjooweshkoonsmish]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Sg+PxX: [jooweshkoonyish, jooweshkoonymish]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Sg+PxX: [jooweshkoonsish, jooweshkoonsmish]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 5]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Sg+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonynaa, njooweshkoonyminaa]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Sg+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonsnaa, njooweshkoonsminaa]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Sg+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonynaa, gjooweshkoonyminaa]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Sg+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonywaa, gjooweshkoonymiwaa]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Sg+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonsnaa, gjooweshkoonsminaa]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Sg+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonswaa, gjooweshkoonsmiwaa]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Sg+Px4: [jooweshkoonyni, jooweshkoonymini]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Sg+Px4: [jooweshkoonsni, jooweshkoonsmini]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 6]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Sg+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonyba, njooweshkoonymiba]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Voc+Pl+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonydig, njooweshkoonymidig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Sg+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonsba, njooweshkoonsmiba]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonsdig, njooweshkoonsmidig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Sg+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonyba, gjooweshkoonymiba]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Voc+Pl+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonydig, gjooweshkoonymidig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Sg+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonsba, gjooweshkoonsmiba]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonsdig, gjooweshkoonsmidig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Sg+PxX: [jooweshkoonyba, jooweshkoonymiba]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Voc+Pl+PxX: [jooweshkoonydig, jooweshkoonymidig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Sg+PxX: [jooweshkoonsba, jooweshkoonsmiba]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl+PxX: [jooweshkoonsdig, jooweshkoonsmidig]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 7]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Obv+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonyin, njooweshkoonyman]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Loc+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonying, njooweshkoonyming]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pl+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonyig, njooweshkoonymag]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Obv+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonsan, njooweshkoonsman]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Loc+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonsing, njooweshkoonsming]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pl+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonsag, njooweshkoonsmag]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Obv+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonyin, gjooweshkoonyman]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Loc+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonying, gjooweshkoonyming]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pl+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonyig, gjooweshkoonymag]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Obv+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonsan, gjooweshkoonsman]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Loc+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonsing, gjooweshkoonsming]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pl+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonsag, gjooweshkoonsmag]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Obv+Px3Sg: [jooweshkoonyin, jooweshkoonyman]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Loc+Px3Sg: [jooweshkoonying, jooweshkoonyming]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Obv+Px3Sg: [jooweshkoonsan, jooweshkoonsman]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Loc+Px3Sg: [jooweshkoonsing, jooweshkoonsming]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Obv+PxX: [jooweshkoonyin, jooweshkoonyman]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Loc+PxX: [jooweshkoonying, jooweshkoonyming]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pl+PxX: [jooweshkoonyig, jooweshkoonymag]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Obv+PxX: [jooweshkoonsan, jooweshkoonsman]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Loc+PxX: [jooweshkoonsing, jooweshkoonsming]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pl+PxX: [jooweshkoonsag, jooweshkoonsmag]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 4]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 5]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 6]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 4, 5]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Sg+Px1Pl: [njooweshkshinaa, njooweshkmishnaa]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Sg+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkshinaa, gjooweshkmishnaa]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Sg+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkshiwaa, gjooweshkmishwaa]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Sg+Px4: [jooweshkshini, jooweshkmishni]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 4, 6]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px1Sg: [njooweshkshiba, njooweshkmishba]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px1Sg: [njooweshkshidig, njooweshkmishdig]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkshiba, gjooweshkmishba]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkshidig, gjooweshkmishdig]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Sg+PxX: [jooweshkshiba, jooweshkmishba]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl+PxX: [jooweshkshidig, jooweshkmishdig]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 4, 7]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Obv+Px1Sg: [njooweshkshan, njooweshkmishan]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Loc+Px1Sg: [njooweshkshing, njooweshkmishing]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Pl+Px1Sg: [njooweshkshag, njooweshkmishag]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Obv+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkshan, gjooweshkmishan]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Loc+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkshing, gjooweshkmishing]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Pl+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkshag, gjooweshkmishag]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Obv+Px3Sg: [jooweshkshan, jooweshkmishan]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Loc+Px3Sg: [jooweshkshing, jooweshkmishing]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Obv+PxX: [jooweshkshan, jooweshkmishan]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Loc+PxX: [jooweshkshing, jooweshkmishing]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Pl+PxX: [jooweshkshag, jooweshkmishag]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 5, 6]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Sg+Px1Pl: [njooweshknaanba, njooweshkminaanba]
     jooweshk+NA+Voc+Pl+Px1Pl: [njooweshknaandig, njooweshkminaandig]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Sg+Px21Pl: [gjooweshknaanba, gjooweshkminaanba]
     jooweshk+NA+Voc+Pl+Px21Pl: [gjooweshknaandig, gjooweshkminaandig]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Sg+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkwaaba, gjooweshkmiwaaba]
     jooweshk+NA+Voc+Pl+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkwaadig, gjooweshkmiwaadig]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Sg+Px4: [jooweshkniwba, jooweshkminwiba]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 5, 7]
     jooweshk+NA+Obv+Px1Pl: [njooweshknaanin, njooweshkminaanin]
     jooweshk+NA+Loc+Px1Pl: [njooweshknaaning, njooweshkminaaning]
     jooweshk+NA+Pl+Px1Pl: [njooweshknaanig, njooweshkminaanig]
     jooweshk+NA+Obv+Px21Pl: [gjooweshknaanin, gjooweshkminaanin]
     jooweshk+NA+Loc+Px21Pl: [gjooweshknaaning, gjooweshkminaaning]
     jooweshk+NA+Pl+Px21Pl: [gjooweshknaanig, gjooweshkminaanig]
     jooweshk+NA+Obv+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkwaan, gjooweshkmiwaan]
     jooweshk+NA+Loc+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkwaang, gjooweshkmiwaang]
     jooweshk+NA+Pl+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkwaag, gjooweshkmiwaag]
     jooweshk+NA+Obv+Px3Pl: [jooweshkwaan, jooweshkmiwaan]
     jooweshk+NA+Loc+Px3Pl: [jooweshkwaang, jooweshkmiwaang]
     jooweshk+NA+Obv+Px4: [jooweshkniwan, jooweshkminwan]
     jooweshk+NA+Loc+Px4: [jooweshkniing, jooweshkminiing]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 6, 7]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Obv+Px1Sg: [njooweshkbaniin, njooweshkmibniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Loc+Px1Sg: [njooweshkbaniing, njooweshkmibniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Pl+Px1Sg: [njooweshkbaniig, njooweshkmibniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Obv+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkbaniin, gjooweshkmibniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Loc+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkbaniing, gjooweshkmibniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Pl+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkbaniig, gjooweshkmibniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Obv+Px3Sg: [jooweshkbaniin, jooweshkmibniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Loc+Px3Sg: [jooweshkbaniing, jooweshkmibniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Obv+PxX: [jooweshkbaniin, jooweshkmibniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Loc+PxX: [jooweshkbaniing, jooweshkmibniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Pl+PxX: [jooweshkbaniig, jooweshkmibniig]
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [2, 4, 6]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Sg: jooweshkoonyshiba
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: jooweshkoonyshidig
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Sg: jooweshkoonsshiba
